Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1616
Public employees; premiums or dues; payment; withhold from wages.

Such political subdivision, municipal corporation, or public body, as set forth in section 44-1615, except a state agency defined in section 81-8,239.01, may approve and expend funds to pay premiums or dues to cover the cost of such plans in whole or in part, and may authorize deductions from salaries or wages of such employees and take such other steps as may be necessary to effectuate and continue such plans.

Laws 1959, c. 213, § 2, p. 735;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 6.

For other provisions permitting payroll deductions for payment of insurance premiums, see section 36-213.